Massachusetts, session 194th, S2829.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection A, paragraph (e) the following
subsection:-
(f) for short-term housing assistance to help families eligible for temporary emergency
shelter under this section in addressing obstacles to maintaining or securing housing; provided,
that the assistance shall include not less than 12 months of housing stabilization and economic
self-sufficiency case management services for each family receiving benefits under this
paragraph; provided further, that families receiving such benefits may receive additional benefits
in 12-month, renewable allotments. A family’s housing stabilization plan shall adequately
accommodate the ages and disabilities of the family members.
So long as a family meets the requirements of its housing stabilization plan, a family that
receives household assistance under this paragraph whose income increases shall not become
ineligible for assistance due to exceeding the income limit. A family shall not be deemed
of 3

ineligible as a result of any single violation of a self-sufficiency plan. The executive office shall
take all steps necessary to enforce regulations to prevent abuse in the short-term housing
transition program, including a wage match agreement with the department of revenue. Families
receiving benefits under this program who are found ineligible for continuing benefits shall be
eligible for aid pending a timely appeal under chapter 23B. Families who are denied assistance
under this paragraph may appeal that denial under said chapter 23B.
The executive office shall promulgate regulations establishing categories of affirmative
eligibility for emergency assistance shelter; provided, that families shall not be required to be
eviction from their existing housing in order to qualify for assistance under this paragraph.
Families in summary process commenced for a reason determined by the executive office
to be a no fault or excused fault reason for eviction can apply and be found eligible for short-
term transition program benefits in order to prevent eviction from existing housing or permit the
family to relocate to another housing situation. The executive office shall allow families to apply
and be found eligible for this short-term housing benefit after the summons and complaint is
filed in court. Families shall be found eligible for short-term housing transition benefits if, but
for feasible alternative housing, they otherwise meet the eligibility requirements for family
shelter.
The executive office shall provide household assistance in an amount up to $50,000 in
the first 24-month period and up to $25,000 in subsequent 12-month periods to eligible families;
provided, that higher caps may be established through annual appropriations.
The executive office shall allow families to combine and maximize benefits under the
Massachusetts short-term housing transition program and residential assistance for families in
of 3

transition funds if families are eligible for both programs, such funds are needed to promote
housing stability and the assistance is non-duplicative.
The executive office of housing and livable communities and its contracted regional
administering agencies may accept applications from landlords on behalf of their tenants under
this section.
SECTION 2. The executive office of housing and livable communities shall promulgate
regulations to carry out this act by December 31, 2027.
of 3